Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3057.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 10A O.S. 2021, Section 1-8-111, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1-8-111. A. The Department of Human Services shall
provide each youth in its custody fourteen (14) years and older an
annual credit report. The Department shall inform the court with
jurisdiction over the youth of any inaccuracies in a credit report
displaying evidence of identity theft or any other activity
fraudulently made on behalf of the youth in custody. The Department
may implement the requirements of this section in stages beginning
with youth in the independent living program whose credit rating may

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3057 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

inhi bit employment and housing opportunities when the child is no
longer in custody.
B. Within one (1) year of November 1, 2014, the The Department
of Human Services shall submit annual reports on the implementation
of the provisions of this section to the Chair and Vice Chair of the
Senate Health and Human Services Committee and the Chair and Vice
Chair of the House Human Services Committee. Such reports shall
include, but not be limited to, the number of youths in the
Department's custody receiving credit score reports, the frequency
of such reports and administrative issues faced by the Department in
the implementation of this section. Such reports shall continue to
be issued by the Department until November 1, 2018.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 27A O.S. 2021, Section 2-6-501.4,
is amended to read as follows:
Section 2-6-501.4. A. 1. The Department shall not approve any
sludge management plan or issue any permit for the land application
of sludge which contains heavy metal concentrations significantly
above concentration ranges normal to sludges with demonstrated
effectiveness on Oklahoma soils as determined by the Department.
Rules promulgated by the Board for applications for sludge
management plans and permits shall require a study of the effects of
the sludge on the various types of soils and crops found at the
location of the proposed sludge application site. Such study shall

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3057 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

enco mpass the effects of the sludge on the soils and crops during
four (4) growing seasons.
2. Any municipality having a sludge management plan approved
prior to May 25, 1992, for the land application of sludge containing
heavy metal concentrations significantly above acceptable
concentration ranges may discontinue such land application of the
sludge or shall develop a corrective action plan containing a
schedule of compliance for reducing the heavy metal concentration to
an acceptable range. The municipality shall submit the corrective
action plan to the Department for approval. If the Department
disapproves of the plan or the municipality fails to comply with the
plan so approved, the Department may require that any such land
applications of sludge by the municipality be discontinued pursuant
to Article II of the Administrative Procedures Act.
B. For developing statewide criteria for application of sludge
which contains heavy metal concentrations significantly above
concentration ranges normal to sludge, the Department shall utilize
a comprehensive study of the potential adverse effects of such
sludge on the soils of this state completed by a qualified research
institute familiar with the crops and soils of this state. Such
study shall be completed by September 1, 1996, and a report of the
findings shall be delivered to the Governor, the President Pro
Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives
and the Executive Director no later than September 1, 1996.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3057 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 56 O.S. 2021, Section 241.4, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 241.4. A. No debit or electronic benefit transfer
cards that contain state or federal funds from programs including,
but not limited to, Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF)
may be used in any transaction in:
1. Any liquor store;
2. Any casino, gambling casino or gaming establishment;
3. Any retail establishment which provides adult-oriented
entertainment in which performers disrobe or perform in an unclothed
state for entertainment; or
4. Any retail establishment whose principal business is that of
selling cigarettes, cigar or tobacco products.
B. For the purposes of this act:
1. "Liquor store" means any retail establishment that sells
exclusively or primarily intoxicating liquor but does not include a
grocery store that sells both intoxicating liquor and groceries;
2. "Casino", "gambling casino" and "gaming establishment" do
not include:
a. a grocery store that sells groceries and that also
offers, or is located within the same building or
complex as an establishment that offers casino,
gambling or gaming activities, or

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3057 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

b. any other establishment that offers casino, gambling
or gaming activities incidental to the principal
purpose of the business; and
3. "Electronic benefit transfer transaction" means the use of a
credit or debit card service, automated teller machine, point-of-
sale terminal or access to an online system for the withdrawal of
funds or the processing of a payment for merchandise or service.
C. An individual who violates the provisions of this section
shall be subject to a reduction in Temporary Assistance for Needy
Families (TANF) benefits as follows:
1. For the first violation, twenty-five percent (25%) of the
individual's TANF payment standard for a period of three (3) months;
2. A second violation following the three (3) month reduction
in benefits shall result in a thirty-five percent (35%) reduction in
TANF benefits for six (6) subsequent months;
3. A third violation following the six (6) month reduction in
benefits shall result in a fifty percent (50%) reduction in TANF
benefits for twelve (12) subsequent months; and
4. Subsequent violations shall result in the individual being
deemed permanently ineligible for TANF benefits. Individuals with
children receiving TANF benefits shall only be eligible to receive
benefit payments for dependent children as provided by state and
federal law.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3057 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

D. By August 1, 2013, the Oklahoma Department of Human Services
shall report on the status of an implementation plan pursuant to the
provisions of this section. The President Pro Tempore of the Senate
and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall be provided
with updates on the status of implementation on a quarterly basis
until provisions of this section are fully implemented by the
Department.
SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 62 O.S. 2021, Section 34.11.1, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 193, O.S.L. 2024 (62 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 34.11.1), is amended to read as follows:
Section 34.11.1. A. There is hereby created the position of
Chief Information Officer who shall be appointed by the Governor.
The Chief Information Officer, in addition to having authority over
the Information Services Division of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services, shall also serve as Secretary of Information
Technology and Telecommunications or successor cabinet position and
shall have jurisdictional areas of responsibility related to
information technology and telecommunications systems of all state
agencies as provided for in state law. The salary of the Chief
Information Officer shall not be less than One Hundred Thirty
Thousand Dollars ($130,000.00) or more than One Hundred Sixty
Thousand Dollars ($160,000.00).
B. Any person appointed to the position of Chief Information
Officer shall meet the following eligibility requirements:
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3057 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

1. A baccalaureate degree in Computer Information Systems,
Information Systems or Technology Management, Business
Administration, Finance, or other similar degree;
2. A minimum of ten (10) years of professional experience with
responsibilities for management and support of information systems
and information technology, including seven (7) years of direct
management of a major information technology operation;
3. Familiarity with local and wide-area network design,
implementation, and operation;
4. Experience with data and voice convergence service
offerings;
5. Experience in developing technology budgets;
6. Experience in developing requests for proposal and
administering the bid process;
7. Experience managing professional staff, teams, and
consultants;
8. Knowledge of telecommunications operations;
9. Ability to develop and set strategic direction for
information technology and telecommunications and to manage daily
development and operations functions;
10. An effective communicator who is able to build consensus;
11. Ability to analyze and resolve complex issues, both logical
and interpersonal;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3057 SFLR Page 9
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

12. Effective verbal and written communications skills and
effective presentation skills, geared toward coordination and
education;
13. Ability to negotiate and defuse conflict; and
14. A self-motivator, independent, cooperative, flexible and
creative.
C. The salary and any other expenses for the Chief Information
Officer shall be budgeted as a separate line item through the Office
of Management and Enterprise Services. The operating expenses of
the Information Services Division shall be set by the Chief
Information Officer and shall be budgeted as a separate line item
through the Office of Management and Enterprise Services. The
Office of Management and Enterprise Services shall provide adequate
office space, equipment and support necessary to enable the Chief
Information Officer to carry out the information technology and
telecommunications duties and responsibilities of the Chief
Information Officer and the Information Services Division.
D. 1. Within twelve (12) months of appointment, the first
Chief Information Officer shall complete an assessment, which shall
be modified annually pursuant to Section 35.5 of this title, of the
implementation of the transfer, coordination, and modernization of
all information technology and telecommunication systems of all
state agencies in the state as provided for in the Oklahoma
Information Services Act. The assessment shall include the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3057 SFLR Page 10
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

info rmation technology and telecommunications systems of all
institutions within The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education,
the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education and the
telecommunications network known as OneNet as assembled and
submitted by the Oklahoma Higher Education Chief Information
Officer, as designated by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education.
2. Within twelve (12) months of appointment, the first Chief
Information Officer shall issue a report setting out a plan of
action which will include the following:
a. define the shared service model organization structure
and the reporting relationship of the recommended
organization,
b. the implementation of an information technology and
telecommunications shared services model that defines
the statewide infrastructure environment needed by
most state agencies that is not specific to individual
agencies and the shared applications that are utilized
across multiple agencies,
c. define the services that shall be in the shared
services model under the control of the Information
Services Division of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services,

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3057 SFLR Page 11
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

d. define the roadmap to implement the proposed shared
services model. The roadmap shall include
recommendations on the transfer, coordination, and
modernization of all information technology and
telecommunication systems of all the state agencies in
the state,
e. recommendations on the reallocation of information
technology and telecommunication resources and
personnel,
f. a cost benefit analysis to support the recommendations
on the reallocation of information technology and
telecommunication resources and personnel,
g. a calculation of the net savings realized through the
reallocation and consolidation of information
technology and telecommunication resources and
personnel after compensating for the cost of
contracting with a private consultant as authorized in
paragraph 4 of this subsection, implementing the plan
of action, and ongoing costs of the Information
Services Division of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services, and
h. the information required in subsection B of Section
35.5 of this title.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3057 SFLR Page 12
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

3. The plan of action report shall be presented to the
Governor, Speaker of the Oklahoma House of Representatives, and the
President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State Senate.
4. The Chief Information Officer may contract with a private
consultant or consultants to assist in the assessment and
development of the plan of action report as required in this
subsection.
E. The Chief Information Officer shall be authorized to employ
personnel, fix the duties and compensation of the personnel, not
otherwise prescribed by law, and otherwise direct the work of the
personnel in performing the function and accomplishing the purposes
of the Information Services Division of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services.
F. E. The Information Services Division of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services shall be responsible for the
following duties:
1. Formulate and implement the information technology strategy
for all state agencies;
2. Define, design, and implement a shared services statewide
infrastructure and application environment for information
technology and telecommunications for all state agencies;
3. Direct the development and operation of a scalable
telecommunications infrastructure that supports data and voice
communications reliability, integrity, and security;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3057 SFLR Page 13
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

4. Supervise the applications development process for those
applications that are utilized across multiple agencies;
5. Provide direction for the professional development of
information technology staff of state agencies and oversee the
professional development of the staff of the Information Services
Division of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services;
6. Evaluate all technology and telecommunication investment
choices for all state agencies;
7. Create a plan to ensure alignment of current systems, tools,
and processes with the strategic information technology plan for all
state agencies;
8. Set direction and provide oversight for the support and
continuous upgrading of the current information technology and
telecommunication infrastructure in the state in support of enhanced
reliability, user service levels, and security;
9. Direct the development, implementation, and management of
appropriate standards, policies and procedures to ensure the success
of state information technology and telecommunication initiatives;
10. Recruit, hire and transfer the required technical staff in
the Information Services Division of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services to support the services provided by the Division
and the execution of the strategic information technology plan;
11. Establish, maintain, and enforce information technology and
telecommunication standards;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3057 SFLR Page 14
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

12. Delegate, coordinate, and review all work to ensure quality
and efficient operation of the Information Services Division of the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services;
13. Create and implement a communication plan that disseminates
pertinent information to state agencies on standards, policies,
procedures, service levels, project status, and other important
information to customers of the Information Services Division of the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services and provide for agency
feedback and performance evaluation by customers of the Division;
14. Develop and implement training programs for state agencies
using the shared services of the Information Services Division of
the Office of Management and Enterprise Services and recommend
training programs to state agencies on information technology and
telecommunication systems, products and procedures;
15. Provide counseling, performance evaluation, training,
motivation, discipline, and assign duties for employees of the
Information Services Division of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services;
16. For all state agencies, approve the purchasing of all
information technology and telecommunication services and approve
the purchase of any information technology and telecommunication
product except the following:
a. a purchase less than or equal to Five Thousand Dollars
($5,000.00) if such product is purchased using a state
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3057 SFLR Page 15
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

purchase card and the product is listed on either the
Approved Hardware or Approved Software list located on
the Office of Management and Enterprise Services
website, or
b. a purchase over Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) and
less than or equal to Twenty-five Thousand Dollars
($25,000.00) if such product is purchased using a
state purchase card, the product is listed on an
information technology or telecommunications statewide
contract, and the product is listed on either the
Approved Hardware or Approved Software list located on
the Office of Management and Enterprise Services
website;
17. Develop and enforce an overall infrastructure architecture
strategy and associated roadmaps for desktop, network, server,
storage, and statewide management systems for state agencies;
18. Effectively manage the design, implementation and support
of complex, highly available infrastructure to ensure optimal
performance, on-time delivery of features, and new products, and
scalable growth;
19. Define and implement a governance model for requesting
services and monitoring service level metrics for all shared
services; and

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3057 SFLR Page 16
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

20. Create the budget for the Information Services Division of
the Office of Management and Enterprise Services to be submitted to
the Legislature each year.
G. F. The State Governmental Technology Applications Review
Board shall provide ongoing oversight of the implementation of the
plan of action required in subsection D of this section. Any
proposed amendments to the plan of action shall be approved by the
Board prior to adoption.
H. G. 1. The Chief Information Officer shall act as the
Information Technology and Telecommunications Purchasing Director
for all state agencies and shall be responsible for the procurement
of all information technology and telecommunication software,
hardware, equipment, peripheral devices, maintenance, consulting
services, high technology systems, and other related information
technology, data processing, telecommunication and related
peripherals and services for all state agencies. The Chief
Information Officer shall establish, implement, and enforce policies
and procedures for the procurement of information technology and
telecommunication software, hardware, equipment, peripheral devices,
maintenance, consulting services, high technology systems, and other
related information technology, data processing, telecommunication
and related peripherals and services by purchase, lease-purchase,
lease with option to purchase, lease and rental for all state
agencies. The procurement policies and procedures established by
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3057 SFLR Page 17
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

the Chief Information Officer shall be consistent with The Oklahoma
Central Purchasing Act.
2. The Chief Information Officer, or any employee or agent of
the Chief Information Officer acting within the scope of delegated
authority, shall have the same power and authority regarding the
procurement of all information technology and telecommunication
products and services as outlined in paragraph 1 of this subsection
for all state agencies as the State Purchasing Director has for all
acquisitions used or consumed by state agencies as established in
The Oklahoma Central Purchasing Act. Such authority shall,
consistent with the authority granted to the State Purchasing
Director pursuant to Section 85.10 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, include the power to designate financial or proprietary
information submitted by a bidder confidential and reject all
requests to disclose the information so designated, if the Chief
Information Officer requires the bidder to submit the financial or
proprietary information with a bid, proposal, or quotation.
I. H. The Information Services Division of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services and the Chief Information Officer
shall be subject to the Oklahoma Central Purchasing Act for the
approval and purchase of all equipment, products, and services and
shall also be subject to the requirements of the Public Competitive
Bidding Act of 1974, the Oklahoma Lighting Energy Conservation Act
and the Public Building Construction and Planning Act. The Chief
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3057 SFLR Page 18
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Info rmation Officer shall be authorized to delegate all or some of
the procurement of information technology and telecommunication
products and services and construction of facilities and
telecommunication networks to another state entity if the Chief
Information Officer determines it to be cost-effective and in the
best interest of the state. The Chief Information Officer shall
have authority to designate information technology and
telecommunication contracts as statewide contracts and mandatory
statewide contracts pursuant to Section 85.5 of Title 74 of the
Oklahoma Statutes and to negotiate consolidation contracts,
enterprise agreements and high technology systems contracts. Any
contract entered into by a state agency for which the Chief
Information Officer has not acted as the Information Technology and
Telecommunications Purchasing Director as required in this
subsection or subsection H G of this section, shall be deemed to be
unenforceable and the Office of Management and Enterprise Services
shall not process any claim associated with the provisions thereof.
J. I. The Chief Information Officer shall establish, implement,
and enforce policies and procedure for the development and
procurement of an interoperable radio communications system for
state agencies. The Chief Information Officer shall work with local
governmental entities in developing the interoperable radio
communications system.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3057 SFLR Page 19
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

K. J. The Chief Information Officer shall develop and implement
a plan to utilize open source technology and products for the
information technology and telecommunication systems of all state
agencies.
L. K. All state agencies and authorities of this state and all
officers and employees of those entities shall work and cooperate
with and lend assistance to the Chief Information Officer and the
Information Services Division of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services and provide any and all information requested by
the Chief Information Officer.
M. L. The Chief Information Officer shall prepare an annual
report detailing the ongoing net saving attributable to the
reallocation and consolidation of information technology and
telecommunication resources and personnel and shall submit the
report to the Governor, the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of
Representatives, and the President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State
Senate.
N. M. For purposes of the Oklahoma Information Services Act,
unless otherwise provided for, "state agencies" shall include any
office, officer, bureau, board, commission, counsel, unit, division,
body, authority or institution of the executive branch of state
government, whether elected or appointed; provided, except with
respect to the provisions of subsection D of this section, the term
"state agencies" shall not include institutions within The Oklahoma
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3057 SFLR Page 20
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Stat e System of Higher Education, the Oklahoma State Regents for
Higher Education and the telecommunications network known as OneNet.
O. N. As used in this section:
1. "High technology system" means advanced technological
equipment, software, communication lines, and services for the
processing, storing, and retrieval of information by a state agency;
2. "Consolidation contract" means a contract for several state
or public agencies for the purpose of purchasing information
technology and telecommunication goods and services; and
3. "Enterprise agreement" means an agreement for information
technology or telecommunication goods and services with a supplier
who manufactures, develops and designs products and provides
services that are used by one or more state agencies.
SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 150.38, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 150.38. A. Subject to the availability of funds, there
is hereby established within the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Investigation the Child Abuse Response Team (CART) for the purpose
of investigating cases of physical and sexual abuse of a child. For
the purpose of implementing CART, the Bureau shall employ at least
eight Law Enforcement Special Agents assigned to the CART, which
shall be full-time-equivalent positions within the Bureau. The
previously unclassified positions of CART investigator and CART

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3057 SFLR Page 21
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

fore nsic interviewer shall be transferred to and placed in the
classified service without a loss in salary.
B. In addition to any other law or rule specifying requirements
or qualifications for an OSBI agent to be employed by the Bureau,
the Child Abuse Response Team employees shall be qualified for the
respective positions as follows:
1. Every CART Agent shall:
a. have at least three (3) years of experience as a
criminal investigator in a law enforcement agency or
agencies,
b. be currently certified as a peace officer by the
Council on Law Enforcement Education and Training
(CLEET),
c. have served as the primary criminal investigative
officer in a law enforcement agency or agencies on
cases of physical or sexual abuse of a child,
d. have graduated from an accredited college or
university with a bachelor degree,
e. have experience in conducting forensic interviews of
children in cases of physical or sexual abuse of a
child,
f. have experience testifying in cases of physical or
sexual abuse of a child, and

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3057 SFLR Page 22
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

g. have completed at least one hundred (100) hours of
education or training on forensic interviewing of a
child.
2. If the director of the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Investigation is unable to find a person whose qualifications meet
or exceed the qualifications specified for the position of Law
Enforcement Special Agent assigned to the CART, the director is
authorized to offer such position to a person whose qualifications
substantially meet the qualifications specified for the position.
C. The Bureau may promulgate rules, procedures and forms
necessary to establish and implement the functions of the Child
Abuse Response Team and to coordinate responsibilities with other
persons or agencies having responsibilities relating to child abuse
investigation and response to child abuse. Members of the Child
Abuse Response Team are authorized, when available, to be involved
and utilized in investigations of crimes other than cases of
physical and sexual abuse of a child.
D. On or before July 1, 2015, the Bureau shall submit to the
Governor, President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and Speaker of the
House of Representatives a statistical report regarding the
activities of the CART.
SECTION 6. REPEALER Section 6, Chapter 222, O.S.L. 2024
(2 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 5-606), is hereby repealed.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3057 SFLR Page 23
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 7. REPEALER Section 3, Chapter 391, O.S.L. 2022
(2 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 11-13), is hereby repealed.
SECTION 8. REPEALER 2 O.S. 2021, Section 18-34, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 9. REPEALER 2 O.S. 2021, Section 18-192, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 10. REPEALER 10 O.S. 2021, Section 22.1, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 11. REPEALER Section 1, Chapter 288, O.S.L. 2024
(17 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 294), is hereby repealed.
SECTION 12. REPEALER 19 O.S. 2021, Section 547.2, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 13. REPEALER 20 O.S. 2021, Section 127, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 14. REPEALER 20 O.S. 2021, Section 1103H, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 15. REPEALER Section 1, Chapter 333, O.S.L.
2023, as amended by Section 4, Chapter 329, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S.
Supp. 2025, Section 2200), is hereby repealed.
SECTION 16. REPEALER 36 O.S. 2021, Section 6057.5, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 17. REPEALER 36 O.S. 2021, Section 6060.9c, is
hereby repealed.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3057 SFLR Page 24
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 18. REPEALER 36 O.S. 2021, Section 6060.13, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 19. REPEALER Section 5, Chapter 151, O.S.L. 2022
(36 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 6060.44), is hereby repealed.
SECTION 20. REPEALER 40 O.S. 2021, Section 800.1, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 401, O.S.L. 2022 (40 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 800.1), is hereby repealed.
SECTION 21. REPEALER Section 1, Chapter 232, O.S.L. 2023
(47 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 173.1), is hereby repealed.
SECTION 22. REPEALER 56 O.S. 2021, Section 162.1b, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 23. REPEALER 56 O.S. 2021, Section 198.11b, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 24. REPEALER 56 O.S. 2021, Section 245, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 25. REPEALER 56 O.S. 2021, Section 3121, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 26. REPEALER 57 O.S. 2021, Section 521.1, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 27. REPEALER 59 O.S. 2021, Section 858-705.1, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 28. REPEALER 63 O.S. 2021, Section 1-534.1, is
hereby repealed.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3057 SFLR Page 25
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 29. REPEALER 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-112, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 30. REPEALER 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-805, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 31. REPEALER 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2175.1, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 32. REPEALER 63 O.S. 2021, Section 5009.6, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 33. REPEALER 63 O.S. 2021, Section 5030.4A, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 34. REPEALER 69 O.S. 2021, Section 1705.6, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 35. REPEALER 69 O.S. 2021, Section 1912, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 36. REPEALER 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3-116.5, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 37. REPEALER 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3-123.1, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 38. REPEALER 70 O.S. 2021, Section 628.19, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 39. REPEALER 74 O.S. 2021, Section 30.2, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 40. REPEALER 74 O.S. 2021, Section 9100, is
hereby repealed.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3057 SFLR Page 26
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 41. REPEALER 82 O.S. 2021, Section 1088.14, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 42. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON RETIREMENT AND GOVERNMENT
RESOURCES
April 14, 2026 - DO PASS



















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3057 SFLR Page 27
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)